Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 6. Foreign Professional Corporations.

§79-10-91.
Authority to transact business.

A foreign professional corporation may not transact business in this state until it obtains a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State.

A foreign professional corporation may not obtain a certificate of authority unless:

Its corporate name satisfies the requirements of Section 79-10-21;

It is incorporated for one or more of the purposes described in Section 79-10-13; and

All of its shareholders would be qualified persons if the foreign professional corporation were a domestic professional corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Domestic professional corporation qualified person defined, see § 79-10-5.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1715, 1730.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 992 et seq.

§79-10-93.
Application for certificate of authority.

The application of a foreign professional corporation for a certificate of authority to render professional services in this state must contain the information called for by Section 79-4-15.03, Mississippi Code of 1972, and in addition include a statement that all of its shareholders meet the requirements of Section 79-10-91(2)(c).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 204 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 968 et seq.

§79-10-95.
Revocation of certificate of authority.

The Secretary of State may administratively revoke under Sections 79-4-15.30 through 79-4-15.32, Mississippi Code of 1972, the certificate of authority of a foreign professional corporation authorized to transact business in this state if a licensing authority with jurisdiction over a professional service described in the corporation’s articles of incorporation certifies to the Secretary of State that the corporation has violated or is violating a provision of this chapter and describes the violation. Such administrative revocation may be challenged by the professional corporation in the chancery court of the county where the professional corporation maintains its principal place of business.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 261.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 968 et seq.